Utah statutes.
59-2-1364.   Record of deeds issued -- Acknowledgment.
The county auditor shall make and keep on file in the county auditor's office
a record of all tax deeds issued.  The acknowledgment of all deeds shall be
taken by the county recorder, or other county officer authorized to take
acknowledgments, free of charge.  No charge may be made by the county auditor
for the making of any deed where the county is the grantee.
